California, session 20252026, AB1431.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17058.5 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17058.5. (a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2025, 2026, and before January 1, 2032, 2031, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount equal to the taxpayer’s qualified income, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) (A) “Medical services” means the diagnosis, treatment, and prevention of illness, injury, or other physical or mental conditions performed by a qualified taxpayer who is physically present while providing those services. “Medical services” includes, but is not limited to, doctor visits, hospital care, surgeries, mental health therapy, and rehabilitative treatments.(B) “Medical services” does not include either of the following: (i) Elective cosmetic procedures.(ii) Telehealth services.(1)(2) “Qualified income” means moneys paid by an employer monetary compensation paid to a qualified taxpayer for medical services performed in a rural area in the state by the qualified taxpayer and authorized under the qualified taxpayer’s license.(2)(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means an individual licensed in the state as any of the following:(A) A dental hygienist licensed pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 1900) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(B) A certified nurse-midwife licensed pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(C) A chiropractor licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(D) A dentist, including a dentist that performs oral and maxillofacial surgery, licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(E) A doctor of podiatric medicine licensed pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 2460) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(F) An optometrist licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(G) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 2099.5) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(H) A physical therapist licensed pursuant to Chapter 5.7 (commencing with Section 2600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(I) A physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(J) A physician assistant licensed pursuant to Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(K) A psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(L) A registered nurse or nurse practitioner licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(M) A speech-language pathologist or audiologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 5.3 (commencing with Section 2530) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code. (3)(4) “Rural area” has the same meaning as in Section 50199.21 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) Any deduction or credit otherwise allowed under this part for any amount of qualified income upon which the credit is based shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed under this section. (d) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and for the seven succeeding years if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.(e) A qualified taxpayer shall report to the Franchise Tax Board, at the board’s Franchise Tax Board’s request and in the form and manner specified by the board, Franchise Tax Board, any information regarding the credit allowed under this section deemed necessary by the Franchise Tax Board for administration of this section.(f) (1) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares that the both of the following:(A) The purpose and specific goal of this credit is to encourage urban medical providers to offer care in underserved rural areas, which would improve access to essential health care services.(B) Detailed performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the credits meet that goal are as follows:(i) The total dollar amount of tax credit allowed pursuant to this section.(ii) The number of taxpayers that were allowed a tax credit pursuant to this section.(2) (A) On or before January 1, 2030, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the total dollar amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to this section and the number of taxpayers allowed a credit pursuant to this section.(B) The disclosure requirements of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.(g) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2032, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.